District of Columbia statutes.
15-907

Conversions of foreign money in distribution proceeding.

The rate of exchange prevailing at or near the close of business on the day the distribution proceeding is initiated governs all exchanges of foreign money in a distribution proceeding. A foreign-money claimant in a distribution proceeding shall assert its claim in the named foreign money and show the amount of United States dollars resulting from a conversion as of the date the proceeding was initiated.

Feb. 10, 1996, D.C. Law 11-85, § 2, 42 DCR 6791
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 8 of the Uniform Foreign-Money Claims Act.
1981 Ed., § 15-907.
This section is referenced in § 15-909.